District of Columbia statutes.
8-433

Prohibited and restricted uses.

(a)

No person or entity shall apply non-essential pesticides to schools, child-occupied facilities, waterbody-contingent property, or District property, except as provided in § 8-434.

(b)

The Department may establish restrictions for District restricted-use pesticides when they are to be used on schools, child-occupied facilities, waterbody-contingent property, or District property.

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-191, § 4, 59 DCR 10166
This section is referenced in § 8-418, § 8-434, and § 8-439.
Section 14(a) of D.C. Law 19-191 provided that §§ 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, and 13 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.